test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_avra_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
+Config: XXX
  hfst: XXX
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: XXX
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests: XXX

  
  Noun - avra: # ok
    avra+N+Sg+Nom: avra
    avra+N+Sg+Gen: aˊvra
    avra+N+Sg+Acc: aˊvra
    avra+N+Sg+Ill: aavran
    avra+N+Sg+Loc: avraast
    avra+N+Sg+Com: avrain
    avra+N+Sg+Abe: aˊvrattáá
    avra+N+Ess: avran
    avra+N+Par: avrad
    avra+N+Pl+Nom: aˊvrah
    avra+N+Pl+Gen: [aˊvrai, avrai]
    avra+N+Pl+Acc: avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Ill: avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Loc: avrain
    avra+N+Pl+Com: aˊvraiguin
    avra+N+Pl+Abe: aˊvraittáá

  Noun - kavra: # - ok
    kavra+N+Sg+Nom:  kavra
    kavra+N+Sg+Gen:  kaˊvra
    kavra+N+Sg+Acc:  kaˊvra
    kavra+N+Sg+Ill:  kaavran
    kavra+N+Sg+Loc:  kavraast
    kavra+N+Sg+Com:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Sg+Abe:  kaˊvrattáá
    kavra+N+Ess:  kavran
    kavra+N+Par:  kavrad
    kavra+N+Pl+Nom:  kaˊvrah
    kavra+N+Pl+Gen:  [kaˊvrai, kavrai]
    kavra+N+Pl+Acc:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Ill:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Loc:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Pl+Com:  kaˊvraiguin
    kavra+N+Pl+Abe:  kaˊvraittáá

  Noun - ohra: # - ok
    ohra+N+Sg+Nom:  ohra
    ohra+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊhra
    ohra+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊhra
    ohra+N+Sg+Ill:  oohran
    ohra+N+Sg+Loc:  ohraast
    ohra+N+Sg+Com:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊhrattáá
    ohra+N+Ess:  ohran
    ohra+N+Par:  ohrad
    ohra+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊhrah
    ohra+N+Pl+Gen:  [oˊhrai, ohrai]
    ohra+N+Pl+Acc:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Ill:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Loc:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Pl+Com:  oˊhraiguin
    ohra+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊhraittáá
